Illinois, session 104th, HB4592.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Retail 5Cash Payment Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Cash" means the coin and paper money of the United 8States.9    "Fuel station" means a retail establishment at which motor 10vehicles are refueled.11    "Grocery store" means a retail establishment where 55% or 12more of its sales consist of nonprescription medicines, 13uncooked foods, beverages, confections, and condiments used 14for or intended to be used for human consumption off-premises.15    "Person" means an individual, natural person, public or 16private corporation, unincorporated association, or other 17entity.18    "Pharmacy" has the meaning set forth in subsection (a) of 19Section 3 of the Pharmacy Practice Act.20    "Prepaid card" means any secured instrument that uses an 21account identification number that is not connected with a 22personal financial account to access deposited cash to 23purchase goods, services, or anything else of value.  HB4592 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 18320 SPS 31760 b1    "Restaurant" means any business that is primarily engaged 2in the sale of ready-to-eat food for immediate consumption 3that comprises at least 51% of the total sales, excluding the 4sale of liquor. "Restaurant" does not include a temporary 5vendor at a market or festival, a business operating from a 6vehicle or other mobile space, or a street vendor.7    "Retail mercantile establishment" means a fuel station, 8grocery store, pharmacy, or restaurant.9    "Self-service checkout" means an interactive electronic 10terminal that facilitates an action or displays a piece of 11information and allows a consumer to pay for goods and 12services. 13    Section 10. Prohibition on Refusing Cash Payments.14    (a) A retail mercantile establishment selling or offering 15to sell goods or services to the public that employs an 16individual to accept in-person payments at a physical location 17shall not:18        (1) refuse to accept cash as a form of payment for 19    sales of less than $500 made at the physical location; or20        (2) post a sign on the premises stating that cash 21    payment is not accepted.22    (b) The provisions of subsection (a) shall not apply to:23        (1) retail sales that take place at a self-service 24    checkout;25        (2) retail sales that occur between 10 p.m. and 6   HB4592 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 18320 SPS 31760 b1    a.m.;2        (3) retail mercantile establishments that are unable 3    to accept cash because of a sales system failure that 4    temporarily prevents the processing of cash payments or a 5    temporary insufficiency in cash on hand needed to provide 6    change;7        (4) retail mercantile establishments that sell 8    consumer goods exclusively through a membership model;9        (5) retail mercantile establishments that (i) accept 10    prepaid cards as payment for goods and services and (ii) 11    provide a mechanism to convert cash to the prepaid card 12    either at the point of sale, self-service checkout, or 13    similar method within the retail mercantile establishment; 14    or15        (6) retail sales that are made through the telephone, 16    Internet, mobile application, or other similar means but 17    are completed in person at the seller's location or 18    off-premises.19    (c) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subsection (b), a 20retail mercantile establishment subject to subsection (a) 21shall be deemed to comply with this Section if no fewer than 22one point of sale at that physical location accepts cash.23    (d) Nothing in this Section requires a person to accept 24any bills larger than $20 as payment for goods or services.25    (e) No person shall limit, regulate, condition, or 26prohibit the ability of any retail mercantile establishment to   HB4592 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 18320 SPS 31760 b1provide discounts, promotions, or incentives to consumers in 2connection with the purchase of goods or services. 3    Section 15. Violations. 4    (a) A violation of this Act shall be a petty offense and 5may be fined as follows:6        (1) for a first violation, a fine not to exceed $50;7        (2) for a second violation within a 12-month period, a 8    fine not to exceed $100;9        (3) for a third violation within a 12-month period, 10    and any additional violation within a 12-month period, a 11    fine not to exceed $500.12    No person shall be fined more than $5,000 in a calendar 13year for violations of this Section. 14    (b) A violation of this Act shall be prosecuted by the 15State's Attorney of the county in which the violation occurred 16as a petty offense. 17    Section 20. Notice to cure. Before a fine may be imposed 18under this Act, the State's Attorney of the county in which the 19violation occurred shall provide the retail mercantile 20establishment with written notice of the violation. The retail 21mercantile establishment shall have 30 days after the date of 22the notice to cure the violation. If the violation is cured 23within the 30-day period, no fine shall be imposed for that 24violation.   HB4592 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 18320 SPS 31760 b1    Section 25. Home rule. The regulation of accepting cash is 2an exclusive power and function of the State, and a home rule 3unit may not regulate the acceptance of cash. This Section is a 4denial and limitation of home rule powers under subsection (h) 5of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution. 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 71, 2028.